Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.891

Apprenticeship programs or certificate programs—Transferable course credits.

Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year, any community or technical college that offers an apprenticeship program or certificate program for paraeducators must provide candidates the opportunity to earn transferable course credits within the program. The programs must also incorporate the standards of practice developed by the Washington professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.260 and include multicultural education and principles of language acquisition. Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, by September 1, 2018, the paraeducator apprenticeship and certificate programs must also incorporate the state paraeducator standards of practice adopted by the paraeducator board under RCW 28A.413.050.

[ 2021 c 197 s 13; 2017 c 237 s 20; 2014 c 136 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.